Vermont, session 2025-2026, H777.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. chapter 87, subchapter 6 is added to read:
Subchapter 6. Vermont Skier Development Fund
§ 2871. VERMONT SKIER DEVELOPMENT SCHOLARSHIP FUND AND
SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM
(a) Special fund.
(1) Pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5, there is established a
special fund to be known as the Vermont Skier Development Scholarship
Fund, which shall be used for the purpose of funding scholarships for up to 20
sponsored Vermont skiers and snowboarders to attend eligible Vermont ski
academies.
(2) The Fund shall be established and held separate and apart from any
other funds or monies of the State and shall be used and administered
exclusively for the purpose of this section and for necessary costs incurred in
administering the Fund. The money in the Fund shall be invested in the same
manner as permitted for the investment of funds belonging to the State or held
in the Treasury. The Fund shall consist of any combination of the following:
(A) sales and use tax in the amount specified in 32 V.S.A. § 9714;
(B) such sums as may be appropriated or transferred thereto from
time to time by the General Assembly, the State Emergency Board, or the Joint
Fiscal Committee during such times as the General Assembly is not in session;
VT LEG #385971 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.777
2026 Page 3 of 13
(C) all interest earned from the investment of Fund balances; and
(D) any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit
of the Fund.
(3) The Fund shall be administered by the Agency of Commerce and
Community Development pursuant to subdivision (b)(5) of this section.
(4) The Agency of Commerce and Community Development shall
administer awards in such a way as to comply with the requirements of the
Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 108(f).
(b) Vermont Skier Development Scholarship Program.
(1) The Agency of Commerce and Community Development shall
establish a scholarship program to facilitate the payment of scholarships from
the Vermont Skier Development Scholarship Fund to eligible Vermont ski
academies on behalf of up to 20 sponsored Vermont skiers and snowboarders
accepted for enrollment in the eligible ski academy of their choice.
(2)(A) Eligible scholarship recipients shall:
(i) have completed eighth grade in either a Vermont public school
or in an approved independent school to which the student’s district of
residence paid publicly funded tuition on behalf of the student pursuant to 16
V.S.A. chapter 21; and
(ii) be enrolled in grades nine, 10, 11, or 12.
VT LEG #385971 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.777
2026 Page 4 of 13
(B) In order to retain a scholarship in subsequent academic years, a
scholarship recipient shall meet the following criteria:
(i) evidence of athletic progress, which shall be demonstrated by:
(I) improved or sustained competitive standing;
(II) minimum training and competition participation thresholds;
and
(III) an independent annual performance review panel
comprised of nonacademy reviewers;
(ii) satisfactory academic progress, attendance compliance, and
code of conduct adherence;
(iii) compliance with injury reporting and return-to-sport
protocols, as well as conditioning and safety training participation; and
(iv) Vermont engagement, which shall be demonstrated by:
(I) annual service contributions; and
(II) maintenance of Vermont affiliation unless such affiliation
is waived for national team placement.
(3) Eligible ski academies shall meet the following criteria:
(A) student support and equity, which shall include:
(i) a demonstrated capacity to serve students with disabilities and
students with mental health and injury recovery needs;
VT LEG #385971 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.777
2026 Page 5 of 13
(ii) access to certified special educators or learning support staff;
and
(iii) compliance with State and federal nondiscrimination laws;
(B) transparency and financial accountability, which shall include
audited tuition and fee schedules;
(C) academic integrity, which shall include:
(i) an accredited academic program or approved partner;
(ii) verified graduation and postsecondary placement data; and
(iii) academic credit transferability to Vermont public schools;
(D) athletic program quality, which shall include:
(i) certified coaching staff;
(ii) athlete-to-coach ratio caps; and
(iii) safety and risk-management protocols; and
(E) data sharing and evaluation, which shall include:
(i) participation in statewide longitudinal tracking;
(ii) consent to independent evaluation of outcomes; and
(iii) annual public reporting of data to the Agency of Commerce
and Community Development.
(4) The Agency of Commerce and Community Development shall adopt
rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to define selection prioritization criteria
VT LEG #385971 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.777
2026 Page 6 of 13
and requirements in accordance with this subdivision. The rules shall use the
following criteria to evaluate selection prioritization:
(A) athletic performance and trajectory, including:
(i) the measurement of potential objective results such as U.S. Ski
Team or International Ski and Snowboard Federation points; Bill Koch Youth
Ski League rankings; or race finishes adjusted for field strength;
(ii) coach-verified progression, which shall include a documented
improvement curve using technical benchmarks and training data; and
(iii) multidiscipline versatility, such as Alpine and Nordic skiing
crossover and speed and technical balance;
(B) Vermont connection and public return, which shall include a
demonstrated commitment to compete under Vermont affiliation or contribute
to Vermont’s ski economy through instruction, racing, patrol, or guiding;
(C) commitment, coachability, and durability, which shall include an
analysis of a potential recipient’s attendance and training consistency, coach
evaluations using standardized rubrics, and injury resilience plan; and
(D) academic readiness, which shall be demonstrated by evidence
that a potential recipient can meet academic requirements with support and a
clear plan to address learning differences.
VT LEG #385971 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.777
2026 Page 7 of 13
(5) The Agency shall administer the Scholarship Program as follows:
(A) The Program shall fund up to 20 scholarships to Vermont ski
academies for sponsored Vermont skiers and snowboarders accepted for
enrollment in the eligible ski academy of their choice.
(B) The Agency may use up to $25,000.00 for administrative costs
and marketing.
(C) To ensure support for competitive adaptive skiers, the Agency
may prioritize the award of up to three scholarships to Vermont adaptive
skiers.
(c) Annually on or before January 15, the Agency shall report to the House
Committee on Commerce and Economic Development and the Senate
Committee on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs the
following data, which shall be used to evaluate Program effectiveness and
return on investment:
(1) talent pipeline outcomes, which shall include:
(A) the percentage of scholarship recipients reaching the U.S. Ski
Team or Development Team; National Collegiate Athletic Association ski
programs; or professional or semiprofessional competition; and
(B) the median improvement in U.S. Ski Team or International Ski
and Snowboard Federation points compared to evenly matched nonscholarship
peers;
VT LEG #385971 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.777
2026 Page 8 of 13
(2) Vermont economic impact, including:
(A) post-Program in-state economic participation, such as coaching,
instruction, guiding, patrol, or racing administration;
(B) estimated lifetime earnings retained in Vermont; and
(C) seasonal employment fill rates in ski industry roles;
(3) access and equity metrics, including:
(A) geographic distribution, such as percentage of scholarship
recipients from rural towns compared to ski resort-adjacent towns;
(B) first-generation competitive skiers;
(C) successful participation by students with disabilities; and
(D) representation of economically disadvantaged students in the
pipeline; and
(4) cost effectiveness, including:
(A) the cost per scholarship recipient reaching predefined milestones;
(B) cost per retained Vermont ski-industry worker; and
(C) a comparison of Program costs to tuition being paid by Vermont
residents to out-of-state ski academies.
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. § 822 is amended to read:
§ 822. SCHOOL DISTRICT TO MAINTAIN PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOLS OR
PAY TUITION
* * *
VT LEG #385971 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.777
2026 Page 9 of 13
(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a)(1) and (c)(1)(B) of this section, a
school board shall be prohibited from paying tuition under this section to a
Vermont ski academy. Secondary students interested in attending a Vermont
ski academy may apply for a scholarship in accordance with the Skier
Development Scholarship Program created pursuant to section 2871 of this
title.
Sec. 3. 16 V.S.A. § 824 is amended to read:
§ 824. HIGH SCHOOL TUITION
* * *
(d) A school board shall be prohibited from paying tuition under this
section to a Vermont ski academy.
Sec. 4. 16 V.S.A. § 828 is amended to read:
§ 828. TUITION TO APPROVED SCHOOLS; AGE; APPEAL
(a) A school district shall not pay the tuition of a student except to:
(1) a public school located in Vermont;
(2) an approved independent school, other than a Vermont ski academy,
that:
(A) is located in Vermont;
(B) is approved under section 166 of this title on or before July 1,
2025;
VT LEG #385971 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.777
2026 Page 10 of 13
(C) is located within either:
(i) a supervisory district that does not operate a public school for
some or all grades as of July 1, 2024; or
(ii) a supervisory union with one or more member school districts
that does not operate a public school for some or all grades as of July 1, 2024;
(D) had at least 25 70 percent of its student enrollment composed of
students attending on a district-funded tuition basis pursuant to chapter 21 of
this title during the 2023–2024 school year; and
(E) complies with the minimum class size requirements contained in
subdivision 165(a)(9) of this title and State Board rule; provided, however, that
if a school is unable to comply with the class size minimum standards due to
geographic isolation or a school has developed an implementation plan to meet
the class size minimum requirements, the school may ask the State Board to
grant it a waiver from this subdivision (E), which decision shall be final;
(F) meets education quality standards; and
(G) publicly reports assessment and demographic data in the same
manner as public schools publicly report the same data;
(3) an independent school meeting education quality standards, other
than a Vermont ski academy;
(4) a tutorial program approved by the State Board;
VT LEG #385971 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.777
2026 Page 11 of 13
(5) an approved education program; [Repealed.]
(6) a public school located in another state; or
(7) a therapeutic approved independent school located in Vermont or
another state or country that is approved under the laws of that state or country
substantially separate setting operated in a manner consistent with the
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. chapter 33, and
individualized education programs.
* * *
(d) As used in this section, “therapeutic approved independent school”
means an approved independent school that limits enrollment for publicly
funded students residing in Vermont to students who are on an individualized
education program or plan under Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of
1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794, or who are enrolled pursuant to a written agreement
between a local education agency and the school or pursuant to a court order.
[Repealed.]
Sec. 5. 32 V.S.A. § 9714 is added to read:
§ 9714. SALES AND USE TAX REVENUE; VERMONT SKIER
DEVELOPMENT SCHOLARSHIP FUND
Notwithstanding 16 V.S.A. § 4025, $525,000.00 in revenue from the sales
and use tax imposed by chapter 233 of this title shall be deposited annually
into the Skier Development Scholarship Fund established pursuant to 16
VT LEG #385971 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.777
2026 Page 12 of 13
V.S.A. § 2871. This amount shall be adjusted for inflation by the National
Income and Product Accounts (NIPA) implicit price deflator for state and local
government consumption expenditures and gross investment published by the
U.S. Department of Commerce, Bureau of Economic Analysis, annually on or
before November 15 from fiscal year 2026 through the fiscal year for which
the amount is being determined, and rounding upward to the nearest whole
dollar amount.
Sec. 6. PROSPECTIVE REPEAL OF THE VERMONT SKIER
DEVELOPMENT SCHOLARSHIP FUND AND PROGRAM
The following are repealed on July 1, 2031:
(1) 16 V.S.A. chapter 87, subchapter 6 (Vermont Skier Development
Scholarship Fund and Program);
(2) 32 V.S.A. § 9714 (sales and use tax revenue; Vermont Skier
Development Scholarship Fund);
(3) 16 V.S.A. § 822(d) (maintenance of public high schools; prohibition
on paying tuition to ski academies); and
(4) 16 V.S.A. § 824(d) (high school tuition; prohibition on paying
tuition to ski academies).
Sec. 7. TRANSFER
Notwithstanding 16 V.S.A. § 4025, on or before July 15, 2026, the
Commissioner of Finance and Management shall transfer $525,000.00 from
VT LEG #385971 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.777
2026 Page 13 of 13
the Education Fund to the Vermont Skier Development Scholarship Fund
established pursuant to 16 V.S.A. § 2871.
Sec. 8. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385971 v.3